lt-LT: Lipduko paviršius: Skaidrus / permatomas; Su blizgučiais; Blizgus; Holografinis; Vaivorykštinis; Matinis; Metalizuotas / folijos; Perlamutrinis; Satininis; Tekstūrinis; Kita
sv: Ytfinish för klistermärke: Klar/transparent; Glitter; Blank; Holografisk; Iriserande; Matt; Metallic/folie; Pärlemor; Satin; Strukturerad; Övrigt
el: Φινίρισμα αυτοκόλλητου: Διάφανο/διαφανές; Γκλίτερ; Γυαλιστερό; Ολογραφικό; Ιριδίζον; Ματ; Μεταλλικό/foil; Περλέ; Σατινέ; Με υφή; Άλλο
es: Acabado de la pegatina: Claro/transparente; Con purpurina; Brillante; Holográfico; Iridiscente; Mate; Metálico/laminado; Nacarado; Satinado; Texturizado; Otro
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava nálepky: Číry/priehľadný; Trblietavý; Lesklý; Holografický; Iridescentný; Matný; Kovový/fóliový; Perleťový; Saténový; Textúrovaný; Iné
en: Sticker finish: Clear/transparent; Glitter; Glossy; Holographic; Iridescent; Matte; Metallic/foil; Pearlescent; Satin; Textured; Other
vi: Lớp phủ hoàn thiện của hình dán: Trong suốt; Lấp lánh; Bóng; Hologram; Ánh xà cừ; Mờ; Ánh kim/giấy bạc; Ánh ngọc trai; Satin; Nhám; Khác
da: Finish på sticker: Klar/gennemsigtig; Glimmer; Blank; Holografisk; Iriserende; Mat; Metallisk/folie; Perlemorsfarvet; Satin; Tekstureret; Andet
de: Stickeroberfläche: Klar/Transparent; Glitzer; Glänzend; Holografisch; Schillernd; Matt; Metallisch/Folie; Perlglanz; Satin; Strukturiert; Andere
fi: Tarran viimeistely: Kirkas/läpinäkyvä; Kimalle; Kiiltävä; Holografinen; Irisoiva; Matta; Metallinen/folio; Helmiäinen; Satiini; Kuvioitu; Muu
ru: Отделка наклейки: Прозрачная; С блестками; Глянцевая; Голографическая; Радужная; Матовая; Металлизированная/из фольги; Перламутровая; Сатиновая; Текстурированная; Другое
pt-PT: Acabamento do autocolante: Claro/transparente; Purpurinas; Brilhante; Holográfico; Iridescente; Mate; Metálico/folha; Nacarado; Acetinado; Texturizado; Outro
sl-SI: Končni izgled nalepke: Prozorno/transparentno; Z bleščicami; Sijaj; Holografsko; Prelivajoče; Mat; Kovinsko/folija; Biserno; Saten; Teksturirano; Drugo
pt-BR: Acabamento em adesivo: Claro/transparente; Glitter; Brilhante; Holográfico; Iridescente; Fosco; Metálico/metalizado; Perolado; Acetinado; Texturizado; Outro
ja: シール仕上げ: クリア/透明; グリッター; 光沢; ホログラム; アイリディセント; マット; メタリック/箔押し; パール; サテン; テクスチャード; その他
hr-HR: Završna obrada naljepnice: Bistro / prozirno; Sa šljokicama; Sjajno; Holografsko; Prelijevajuće; Matirano; Metalik / folija; Sedefasto; Saten; Teksturirano; Ostalo
tr: Çıkartma yüzey bitişi: Şeffaf/transparan; Simli; Parlak; Holografik; Yanardöner; Mat; Metalik/folyo; Sedefli; Saten; Dokulu; Diğer
it: Finitura dell'adesivo: Chiaro/trasparente; Glitterato; Lucido; Olografico; Iridescente; Opaco; Metallizzato/laminato; Perlescente; Satinato; Testurizzato; Altro
zh-CN: 贴纸表面处理: 清透/透明; 闪粉; 光面; 全息; 幻彩; 哑光; 金属/金箔; 珠光; 缎面; 纹理; 其他
fr: Finition autocollante: Clair/transparent; Pailleté; Brillant; Holographique; Irisé; Mat; Métallique/laminé; Nacré; Satiné; Texturé; Autre
ro-RO: Finisaj al autocolantului: Clar/transparent; Sclipici; Lucios; Holografic; Iridescent; Mat; Metalizat/folie; Sidefat; Satinat; Texturat; Altele
hu: Matrica felülete: Átlátszó/transzparens; Csillámos; Fényes; Holografikus; Színjátszó; Matt; Fémes/fóliás; Gyöngyházfényű; Szatén; Texturált; Egyéb
zh-TW: 貼紙表面處理: 透明; 亮粉; 亮面; 雷射全像; 幻彩; 霧面; 金屬/燙金; 珠光; 絲緞; 紋理; 其他
th: ลักษณะพื้นผิวของสติกเกอร์: ใส/โปร่งแสง; กลิตเตอร์; มันวาว; โฮโลแกรม; สีเหลือบรุ้ง; ด้าน; เมทัลลิก/ฟอยล์; มุก; ซาติน; มีพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
nb: Overflatebehandling for klistremerke: Klar / gjennomsiktig; Glitter; Blank; Holografisk; Iriserende; Matt; Metallisk / folie; Perlemor; Sateng; Teksturert; Annet
pl: Wykończenie naklejki: Przezroczyste; Z brokatem; Błyszczące; Holograficzne; Opalizujące; Matowe; Metaliczne/foliowe; Perłowe; Satynowe; Teksturowane; Inne
ko: 스티커 마감: 클리어/투명; 글리터; 글로시; 홀로그래픽; 무지갯빛; 매트; 메탈릭/포일; 펄; 새틴; 질감 있음; 기타
nl: Stickerafwerking: Helder/transparant; Glitter; Glanzend; Holografisch; Iriserend; Mat; Metallic/folie; Parelmoer; Satijn; Met textuur; Overig
bg-BG: Финиш на стикера: Прозрачен; С брокат; Гланц; Холографски; Преливащ; Мат; Металик/фолио; Перлен; Сатен; Текстуриран; Друго
cs: Povrchová úprava nálepky: Čirý/průhledný; Se třpytkami; Lesklý; Holografický; Měňavý; Matný; Metalický/fólie; Perleťový; Saténový; Strukturovaný; Jiný